Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5574.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 39-2 of the General Laws entitled "Duties of Utilities and Carriers"
is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
39-2-29. Removal of double utility poles.
(a) For the purposes of this section the following terms shall have the following meanings:
(1) "Division" means the division of public utilities and carriers.
(2) "Double utility pole" means a replacement utility pole that is built alongside and
attached to another pole for the purpose of transferring the electric, telephone, cable or other wires.
(3) "Plant" means the cables, terminals, conductors and other fixtures necessary for
transmitting electric, cable, television or other telecommunications service.
(4) "Public utility" means and applies to every corporation, company, person, association
of persons, their lessees, trustees, or receivers appointed to any court whatsoever, that now or
hereafter may own, lease, operate, manage or control any electric plant or equipment or any part of
any electric plant or equipment, within this state, for the production, transmission, delivery or
furnishing of electricity, light, heat or power, either directly to or for the public.
(b) The owner of a double utility pole shall notify all other users of the utility pole of the
starting date of such removal and installation work at least seventy-two (72) hours prior to the
commencement of such work. Said owner may impose a penalty upon the user who has not
removed their wiring and other attachments/plants when said failure to remove is responsible for

the immediate delay in the removal of the existing pole. No penalty shall be imposed when the
failure of a city or town to remove its police or fire alarm circuits or any similar municipal
equipment is the cause of the immediate delay and no other work could be performed.
(c) An electric distribution company or telephone company engaging in the removal of an
existing pole and the installation of a new pole in place thereof shall complete the transfer of wires,
plants, all repairs and the removal of the existing pole within thirty (30) days from the date of the
installation of the new pole. Failure to remove the old pole within that time frame shall be subject
to a daily penalty of up to one hundred dollars ($100) by the division.
(d) Any fines collected for violation of this section shall be donated to the low-income
home energy assistance program.
(e) The division of public utilities and carriers shall administer and enforce the provisions
of this section.
(f) The division of public utilities and carriers shall promulgate rules and regulations
necessary to effectuate the purposes of this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001130
========
LC001130 - Page 2 of 3